Utah statutes.
10-5-113.   Accumulation of retained earnings or fund balance -- Limit as to
general fund -- Reserve for capital improvements.
(1)  Towns may accumulate retained earnings or fund balances, as appropriate,
in any fund.
(2)  The accumulation of a fund balance in the General Fund may not exceed 75%
of the total estimated revenue of the General Fund.
(3)  The council may, in any budget year, appropriate from estimated revenue
or excess fund balance in the General Fund to a reserve for capital
improvements, for the purpose of financing future specified capital
improvements, pursuant to a formal long-range capital plan adopted by the
governing body.  The reserves may accumulate from year to year in a capital
improvements fund until the accumulated total is sufficient to permit
economical expenditure for the specified purposes.
